Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 1. In General

Cross references. —

As to duty to bury or cremate dead human bodies after use for scientific purposes, see §

35-4-605

.

For offenses of molesting graves or mutilation of dead bodies, see §§

6-4-501

,

6-4-502

.

As to duty of coroner to bury deceased persons without friends, see §

7-4-207

.

As to disposition of body of executed convict, see §

7-13-915

.

As to burial of indigent veterans, see §

19-14-101

.

As to prepaid or prearranged funeral contracts, see §§

26-32-101

to

26-32-103

.

For provisions relating to embalmers, funeral directors and undertakers generally, see §§

33-16-101

to

33-16-317

.

§ 35-8-101.
Survey and platting of cemetery grounds.

Any person, firm, corporation or municipality desiring to maintain a cemetery or to sell lots or parcels of land for cemetery or burial purposes shall cause such land, or such portion thereof as may, from time to time be or become necessary for that purpose, to be surveyed into lots, blocks, streets, avenues and walks, and platted; and the lots and blocks shall be regularly numbered or designated and marked on such plat. The plat of the ground so surveyed and platted, and the dedication of the streets, avenues and walks as set forth therein, shall be duly executed and acknowledged by the person, firm, corporation or municipality owning such property in accord with the requirements for the conveyances of real property and shall be filed and recorded in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the land so platted is situated; and when so platted, filed and recorded the streets, avenues and walks as therein dedicated to the public, shall be the property of the county in which such cemetery is situated for the use and benefit of the owners of lots and blocks therein.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 138, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 18-101; C.S. 1945, § 38-101; W.S. 1957, § 35-372.

Cross references. —

For provision allowing petition of common property except cemeteries jointly used by religious societies or congregations, see §

1-32-121

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Zoning regulations in relation to cemeteries, 96 ALR3d 921.

§ 35-8-102.
Conveyance of cemetery lots.

Cemetery lots or blocks may be conveyed by certificates signed by the owner thereof, with the corporate or municipal seal attached and attested by the secretary or clerk in appropriate cases, specifying that the person to whom the same is issued is the owner of the lot or block, described therein by number or other symbol, for the purpose of interment, and such certificate shall vest in the person designated therein, his heirs or assigns, a right in fee simple to such lot or block for the sole purpose of interment, under the regulations of the owner thereof, and such certificate shall be entitled to be recorded in the office of the county clerk in the proper county, without further acknowledgment, and such description of lots shall be deemed and recognized as a sufficient description thereof.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 138, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 18-104; C.S. 1945, § 38-104; W.S. 1957, § 34-373.

Cross references. —

For authority of United States to acquire land for national cemeteries, see §

36-10-101

.

§ 35-8-103.
Use of income derived from sale of lots; perpetual care fund; funds to be as a trust; not liable to attachment or garnishment.

The proceeds arising from the sale of lots in any cemetery by any person, firm, corporation or municipality, and all other income and revenue thereof, shall be exclusively applied, appropriated or used in improving, preserving and embellishing such cemetery, and its appurtenances, and to paying the necessary operating expenses thereof, and shall not be applied or appropriated to any purpose of profit to the person, firm, corporation or municipality owning or maintaining same; provided, that any mutual cemetery corporation or municipality may use such income and revenue for purchasing or acquiring additional adjacent grounds for cemetery purposes only; provided, however, any cemetery organized by any individual, group of individuals, corporation or association, except municipal corporations and duly organized cemetery districts shall establish a perpetual care fund in an amount equal to at least ninety cents ($.90) for each square foot of cemetery lot sold after the effective date of this act. In support of, and for the protection of such perpetual care fund, there shall be established a trust fund in such amount and under such terms and conditions, including bonded protection of a permanent and enduring nature, as the insurance commissioner of the state of Wyoming may prescribe to carry out the objectives and contractual commitments and trust of such individual, corporation or association. In the case of the operation of a mausoleum for the sale of vaults or crypts therein the perpetual care fund shall be twenty percent (20%) of the purchase price. Such fund shall be operated as a perpetual trust according to requirements approved by the insurance department, and shall be used for the benefit of the grave sales and cemetery lots for which deposits shall have been made. The insurance commissioner shall specify securities approved for the investment of the funds which shall include investment of funds with a duly licensed Wyoming bank, trust company, or federal building and loan association, and may require an audit of all of the books and accounts of the cemetery as the need may arise. The cemetery organization shall file a copy of a purchase contract or installment contract for lot or lots, if any there be, with the insurance commissioner when said contract is entered into and shall forthwith notify the insurance commissioner of the final payment or default, if any be made, of such contract or contracts. Any and all funds received and invested as stipulated in this act, and the income therefrom, shall be as a trust and shall not be liable to attachment, garnishment, or other processes, nor shall be seized, taken or appropriated or applied by any legal or equitable processes or operation of law to pay any debt or liability of the person, partnership, association, company or corporation organizing or thereafter operating such cemetery.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 138, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 18-102; C.S. 1945, § 38-102; Laws 1955, ch. 239, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-374.

Cross references. —

As to perpetual care and maintenance trust fund, see §

35-8-404

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of statutes or ordinances regulating perpetual-care trust funds of cemeteries and mausoleums, 54 ALR5th 681.

§ 35-8-104.
Exemption from taxation.

All property of any person, firm, corporation or municipality so platted and dedicated for cemetery purposes, shall be exempt from taxation, assessment, lien, attachment, and from levy and sale upon execution, except for the purchase price thereof.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 138, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 18-103; C.S. 1945, § 38-103; W.S. 1957, § 35-375.

§ 35-8-105.
Prohibited acts; penalty for violation.

Any person, firm, or the managing officer or officers of any corporation or municipality that sells, contracts for sale, or in any other manner disposes of any lot, block or parcel of land for interment or burial of deceased persons therein, either for money or other thing of value, without having complied with all of the provisions of this act [§§

35-8-101

to

35-8-105

], and any person, firm, or the managing officer or officers of any corporation or municipality that uses any of the proceeds, income, revenue or profits from the sale of any lot, block or parcel of land for the interment or burial of deceased persons therein, for his private gain or benefit, excepting only those operating reserve or endowment fund cemeteries as provided in this act, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof such person or firm or the managing officer or officers of such corporation or municipality shall be fined any sum not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00), or be imprisoned in the county jail for not to exceed three (3) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 138, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 18-105; C.S. 1945, § 38-105; W.S. 1957, § 35-376.